North Carolina statutes. Chapter 62. Public Utilities.
Article 7. Rates of Public Utilities.

§ 62-130.
Commission to make rates for public utilities.

The Commission shall make, fix, establish or allow just and reasonable rates for all public utilities subject to its jurisdiction. A rate is made, fixed, established or allowed when it becomes effective pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter.

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 676, s. 15.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-23, s. 14, effective May 17, 2021.

The Commission shall from time to time as often as circumstances may require, change and revise or cause to be changed or revised any rates fixed by the Commission, or allowed to be charged by any public utility.

In all cases where the Commission requires or orders a public utility to refund moneys to its customers which were advanced by or overcollected from its customers, the Commission shall require or order the utility to add to said refund an amount of interest at such rate as the Commission may determine to be just and reasonable; provided, however, that such rate of interest applicable to said refund shall not exceed ten percent (10%) per annum.

History.

1899, c. 164, ss. 2, 7, 14; 1903, c. 683; Rev., ss. 1096, 1099, 1106; 1907, c. 469, s. 4; Ex. Sess. 1908, c. 144, s. 1; 1913, c. 127, s. 2; 1917, c. 194; C.S., ss. 1066, 1071, 3489; Ex. Sess. 1920, c. 51, s. 1; 1925, c. 37; 1929, cc. 82, 91; 1933, c. 134, s. 8; 1941, c. 97; 1953, c. 170; 1963, c. 1165, s. 1; 1981, c. 461, s. 1; 1985, c. 676, s. 15(1); 2021-23, s. 14.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-23, s. 14, effective May 17, 2021, deleted subsection (c).

Legal Periodicals.

For article on electric rates, see 12 N.C.L. Rev. 289 (1934).

§ 62-131.
Rates must be just and reasonable; service efficient.

Every rate made, demanded or received by any public utility, or by any two or more public utilities jointly, shall be just and reasonable.

Every public utility shall furnish adequate, efficient and reasonable service.

History.

1933, c. 307, ss. 2, 3; 1963, c. 1165, s. 1.

§ 62-132.
Rates established under this Chapter deemed just and reasonable; remedy for collection of unjust or unreasonable rates.

The rates established under this Chapter by the Commission shall be deemed just and reasonable, and any rate charged by any public utility different from those so established shall be deemed unjust and unreasonable. Provided, however, that upon petition filed by any interested person, and a hearing thereon, if the Commission shall find the rates or charges collected to be other than the rates established by the Commission, and to be unjust, unreasonable, discriminatory or preferential, the Commission may enter an order awarding such petitioner and all other persons in the same class a sum equal to the difference between such unjust, unreasonable, discriminatory or preferential rates or charges and the rates or charges found by the Commission to be just and reasonable, nondiscriminatory and nonpreferential, to the extent that such rates or charges were collected within two years prior to the filing of such petition.

History.

1913, c. 127, s. 3; C.S., s. 1067; 1929, cc. 241, 342; 1933, c. 134, s. 8; 1941, c. 97; 1963, c. 1165, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1976 case law dealing with administrative law, see 55 N.C.L. Rev. 898 (1977).

For survey of 1978 administrative law, see 57 N.C.L. Rev. 831 (1979).

§ 62-133.
How rates fixed.

In fixing the rates for any public utility subject to the provisions of this Chapter, other than bus companies, motor carriers and certain water and sewer utilities, the Commission shall fix such rates as shall be fair both to the public utilities and to the consumer.

In fixing such rates, the Commission shall:

Ascertain the reasonable original cost or the fair value under

G.S. 62-133.1

A of the public utility’s property used and useful, or to be used and useful within a reasonable time after the test period, in providing the service rendered to the public within the State, less that portion of the cost that has been consumed by previous use recovered by depreciation expense. In addition, construction work in progress may be included in the cost of the public utility’s property under any of the following circumstances:

To the extent the Commission considers inclusion in the public interest and necessary to the financial stability of the utility in question, reasonable and prudent expenditures for construction work in progress may be included, subject to the provisions of subdivision (4a) of this subsection.

For baseload electric generating facilities, reasonable and prudent expenditures shall be included pursuant to subdivisions (2) or (3) of G.S. 62-110.1(f1), whichever applies, subject to the provisions of subdivision (4a) of this subsection.

(1a)

Apply the rate of return established under subdivision (4) of this subsection to rights-of-way acquired through agreements with the Department of Transportation pursuant to G.S. 136-19.5(a) if acquisition is consistent with a definite plan to provide service within five years of the date of the agreement and if such right-of-way acquisition will result in benefits to the ratepayers. If a right-of-way is not used within a reasonable time after the expiration of the five-year period, it may be removed from the rate base by the Commission when rates for the public utility are next established under this section.

Estimate such public utility’s revenue under the present and proposed rates.

Ascertain such public utility’s reasonable operating expenses, including actual investment currently consumed through reasonable actual depreciation.

Fix such rate of return on the cost of the property ascertained pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection as will enable the public utility by sound management to produce a fair return for its shareholders, considering changing economic conditions and other factors, including, but not limited to, the inclusion of construction work in progress in the utility’s property under sub-subdivision b. of subdivision (1) of this subsection, as they then exist, to maintain its facilities and services in accordance with the reasonable requirements of its customers in the territory covered by its franchise, and to compete in the market for capital funds on terms that are reasonable and that are fair to its customers and to its existing investors.

(4a)

Require each public utility to discontinue capitalization of the composite carrying cost of capital funds used to finance construction (allowance for funds) on the construction work in progress included in its rate based upon the effective date of the first and each subsequent general rate order issued with respect to it after the effective date of this subsection; allowance for funds may be capitalized with respect to expenditures for construction work in progress not included in the utility’s property upon which the rates were fixed. In determining net operating income for return, the Commission shall not include any capitalized allowance for funds used during construction on the construction work in progress included in the utility’s rate base.

Fix such rates to be charged by the public utility as will earn in addition to reasonable operating expenses ascertained pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection the rate of return fixed pursuant to subdivisions (4) and (4a) on the cost of the public utility’s property ascertained pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (1a) of this subsection.

The original cost of the public utility’s property, including its construction work in progress, shall be determined as of the end of the test period used in the hearing and the probable future revenues and expenses shall be based on the plant and equipment in operation at that time. If the public utility elects to establish rate base using fair value, the fair value determination of the public utility’s property shall be made as provided in

G.S. 62-133.1

A, and the probable future revenues and expenses shall be based on the plant and equipment in operation at the end of the test period. The test period shall consist of 12 months’ historical operating experience prior to the date the rates are proposed to become effective, but the Commission shall consider such relevant, material and competent evidence as may be offered by any party to the proceeding tending to show actual changes in costs, revenues or the cost of the public utility’s property used and useful, or to be used and useful within a reasonable time after the test period, in providing the service rendered to the public within this State, including its construction work in progress, which is based upon circumstances and events occurring up to the time the hearing is closed.

The Commission shall consider all other material facts of record that will enable it to determine what are reasonable and just rates.

The fixing of a rate of return shall not bar the fixing of a different rate of return in a subsequent proceeding.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 598, s. 7.

Reserved.

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-128, s. 4, effective September 4, 1998.

History.

1899, c. 164, s. 2, subsec. 1; Rev., s. 1104; C.S., s. 1068; 1933, c. 134, s. 8; 1941, c. 97; 1963, c. 1165, s. 1; 1971, c. 1092; 1973, c. 956, s. 1; c. 1041, s. 1; 1975, c. 184, s. 2; 1977, c. 691, ss. 2, 3; 1981, c. 476; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1197, s. 6; 1985, c. 676, s. 15(2); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 962, s. 4; 1991, c. 598, s. 7; 1998-128, s. 4; 2007-397, s. 8; 2018-51, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to small water and sewer utility rates, see

G.S. 62-133.1

.

§ 62-133.1.
Small water and sewer utility rates.

In fixing the rates for any water or sewer utility, the Commission may fix such rates on the ratio of the operating expenses to the operating revenues, such ratio to be determined by the Commission, unless the utility requests that such rates be fixed under G.S. 62-133(b) or

G.S. 62-133.1

B. Nothing in this subsection shall be held to extinguish any remedy or right not inconsistent herewith. This subsection shall be in addition to other provisions of this Chapter which relate to public utilities generally, except that in cases of conflict between such other provisions, this section shall prevail for water and sewer utilities.

A water or sewer utility may enter into uniform contracts with nonusers of its utility service within a specific subdivision or development for the payment by such nonusers to the utility of a fee or charge for placing or maintaining lines or other facilities or otherwise making and keeping such utility’s service available to such nonusers; or such a utility may, by contract of assignment, receive the benefits and assume the obligations of uniform contracts entered into between the developers of subdivisions and the purchasers of lots in such subdivisions whereby such developer has contracted to make utility service available to lots in such subdivision and purchasers of such lots have contracted to pay a fee or charge for the availability of such utility service; provided, however, that the maximum nonuser rate shall be as established by contract, except that the contractual charge to nonusers of the utility service can never exceed the lawfully established minimum rate to user customers of the utility service.

History.

1973, c. 956, s. 2; 2021-149, s. 1(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-149, s. 1(b), effective September 10, 2021, substituted “G.S. 62-133(b) or

G.S. 62-133.1

B” for “G.S. 62-133(b)” in subsection (a).

§ 62-133.1A.
Fair value determination of government-owned water and wastewater systems.

Election. — A water or wastewater public utility, as defined by G.S. 62-3(23)a.2., may elect to establish rate base by using the fair value of the utility property instead of original cost when acquiring an existing water or wastewater system owned by a municipality or county or an authority or district established under Chapter 162A of the General Statutes.

Determination of Fair Value. —

The fair value of a system to be acquired shall be based on three separate appraisals conducted by accredited, impartial valuation experts chosen from a list to be established by the Commission. The following shall apply to the valuation:

One appraiser shall represent the public utility acquiring the system, another appraiser shall represent the utility selling the system, and another appraiser shall represent the Public Staff of the Commission.

Each appraiser shall determine fair value in compliance with the uniform standards of professional appraisal practice, employing cost, market, and income approaches to assessment of value.

Fair value, for ratemaking purposes under

G.S. 62-133

, shall be the average of the three appraisals provided for by this subsection.

The original source of funding for all or any portions of the water and sewer assets being acquired is not relevant to an evaluation of fair value.

The acquiring public utility and selling utility shall jointly retain a licensed engineer to conduct an assessment of the tangible assets of the system to be acquired, and the assessment shall be used by the three appraisers in determining fair value.

Reasonable fees, as determined by the Commission, paid to utility valuation experts, may be included in the cost of the acquired system, in addition to reasonable transaction and closing costs incurred by the acquiring public utility.

The rate base value of the acquired system, which shall be reflected in the acquiring public utility’s next general rate case for ratemaking purposes, shall be the lesser of the purchase price negotiated between the parties to the sale or the fair value plus the fees and costs authorized in subdivision (3) of this subsection.

The normal rules of depreciation shall begin to apply against the rate base value upon purchase of the system by the acquiring public utility.

An application to the Commission for a determination of the rate base value of the system to be acquired shall contain all of the following:

Copies of the valuations performed by the appraisers, as provided in subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section.

Any deficiencies identified by the engineering assessment conducted pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this section and a five-year plan for prudent and necessary infrastructure improvements by the acquiring entity.

Projected rate impact for the selling entity’s customers for the next five years.

The averaging of the appraisers’ valuations, which shall constitute fair value for purposes of this section.

The assessment of tangible assets performed by a licensed professional engineer, as provided in subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this section.

The contract of sale.

The estimated valuation fees and transaction and closing costs incurred by the acquiring public utility.

A tariff, including rates equal to the rates of the selling utility. The selling utility’s rates shall be the rates charged to the customers of the acquiring public utility until the acquiring public utility’s next general rate case, unless otherwise ordered by the Commission for good cause shown.

Final Order. — If the application meets all the requirements of subsection (c) of this section, the Commission shall issue its final order approving or denying the application within six months of the date on which the application was filed. An order approving an application shall determine the rate base value of the acquired property for ratemaking purposes in a manner consistent with the provisions of this section.

Commission’s Authority. — The Commission shall retain its authority under Chapter 62 of the General Statutes to set rates for the acquired system in future rate cases, and shall have the discretion to classify the acquired system as a separate entity for ratemaking purposes, consistent with the public interest. If the Commission finds that the average of the appraisals will not result in a reasonable fair value, the Commission may adjust the fair value as it deems appropriate and in the public interest.

The Commission shall adopt rules to implement this section.

History.

2018-51, s. 2; 2021-23, s. 25.

§ 62-133.1B.
Water and Sewer Investment Plan ratemaking mechanism authorized.

Notwithstanding the methods for fixing water and sewer rates under

G.S. 62-133

or

G.S. 62-133

.1, upon application by a water or sewer utility in a general rate proceeding, the Commission may approve a Water and Sewer Investment Plan. A Water and Sewer Investment Plan, as filed by a water or sewer utility, shall include performance-based metrics that benefit customers and ensure the provision of safe, reliable, and cost-effective service by the water or sewer utility. For purposes of this section, “Water and Sewer Investment Plan” means a plan under which the Commission sets water or sewer base rates, revenue requirements through banding of authorized returns as provided in this section, and authorizes annual rate changes for a three-year period based on reasonably known and measurable capital investments and anticipated reasonable and prudent expenses approved under the plan without the need for a base rate proceeding during the plan period.

The Commission may approve a Water and Sewer Investment Plan proposed by a water or sewer utility only upon a finding by the Commission that the plan results in rates that are just and reasonable and are in the public interest. In reviewing any application under this section, the Commission shall consider whether the water or sewer utility’s application, as proposed, (i) establishes rates that are fair both to the customer and to the water or sewer utility, (ii) reasonably ensures the continuation of safe and reliable utility services, (iii) will not result in sudden substantial rate increases to customers annually or over the term of the plan, (iv) is representative of the utility’s operations over the plan term, and (v) is otherwise in the public interest. In approving an application submitted under this section, the Commission may impose any conditions in the implementation of a Water and Sewer Investment Plan that the Commission considers necessary to ensure that the utility complies with the plan, and that the plan and associated rates are just, reasonable, and in the public interest, and the plan reasonably ensures the provision of safe, reliable, and cost-effective service to customers.

Any rate adjustment allowed under a Water and Sewer Investment Plan approved pursuant to this section shall not, on an annual basis for years two and three of the plan, exceed five percent (5%) of the utility’s North Carolina retail jurisdictional gross revenues for the preceding plan year. Upon a petition to the Commission, the Commission may consider the addition of unplanned emergency capital investments that must be undertaken during a plan term to address risk of noncompliance with primary drinking water or effluent standards, or to mitigate cyber or physical security risks, even if such expenditures would cause the above-referenced cap to be exceeded.

Any rate adjustment mechanism authorized pursuant to

G.S. 62-133.12

or

G.S. 62-133.12

A shall be discontinued during the term of any Water and Sewer Investment Plan. The utility may file for a rate adjustment mechanism authorized pursuant to G.S. 62-133.12, which shall not become effective before the end of the Water and Sewer Investment Plan. No capital improvements recovered through a Water and Sewer Investment Plan may be included for recovery in a rate adjustment mechanism authorized pursuant to G.S. 62-133.12.

The Commission shall, after notice and an opportunity for interested parties to be heard, issue an order ruling on the water or sewer utility’s request to adjust base rates under

G.S. 62-133

, denying or approving, with or without modifications, a water or sewer utility’s proposed Water and Sewer Investment Plan. An approved plan shall be effective no later than the end of the maximum suspension period pursuant to G.S. 62-134(b).

At any time, for good cause shown and after an opportunity for hearing, the Commission may modify or terminate an approved Water and Sewer Investment Plan if modification or termination is determined to be in the public interest.

The Commission shall establish banding of authorized returns on equity for Water and Sewer Investment Plans approved pursuant to this section. For purposes of this section, “banding of authorized returns” means a rate mechanism under which the Commission sets an authorized return on equity for a water or sewer utility that acts as a midpoint and then applies a low- and high-end range of returns to that midpoint under which a water or sewer utility will not overearn if within the high-end range and will not underearn if within the low-end range. Any banding of the water or sewer utility’s authorized return shall not exceed 100 basis points above or below the midpoint. [The following applies:]

If a water or sewer utility exceeds the high-end range of the band that is approved by the Commission, the water or sewer utility shall refund or credit earnings above that high-end range to customers in a manner to be prescribed by rules adopted by the Commission pursuant to subsection (i) of this section.

If a water or sewer utility falls below the low-end range of the band that is approved by the Commission, the utility may file a general rate case.

The Commission shall annually review a water or sewer utility’s earnings to ensure the utility is not earning in excess of its allowable return on equity for reasonable and prudent costs to provide service. For purposes of measuring a water or sewer utility’s earnings under any mechanisms, plans, or settlements approved under this section, the utility shall make an annual filing that sets forth the utility’s earned return on equity for the prior 12-month period.

The Commission shall adopt rules to implement the requirements of this section, including rules to:

Establish procedures for filing a Water and Sewer Investment Plan under this section.

Require reporting on an annual basis of performance-based metrics and evaluation of those metrics’ results to ensure the utility continues to perform in a safe, reliable, and cost-effective manner.

Develop banding of authorized returns. In setting a midpoint authorized rate of return on equity for banding of authorized returns pursuant to this section, the Commission may consider any decreased or increased risk to a water or sewer utility that may result from having an approved Water and Sewer Investment Plan.

Establish a procedure for the water or sewer utility to annually refund or credit to customers excess earnings above the high end of the authorized band of returns.

Establish a methodology to annually review the costs subject to the adjustment mechanism, including the opportunity for public hearings.

On or before July 1, 2026, the Commission shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Energy Policy on the impacts of each Water and Sewer Investment Plan approved by the Commission pursuant to this section for a water or sewer utility. At a minimum, the report shall include a Plan’s impact on rates for customers of the applicable utility, the number of customers disconnected for nonpayment in the four years prior to Commission approval of a Plan for the applicable utility, the number of utility customers disconnected for nonpayment after approval and implementation of the Plan to the date the report is submitted, and the amount of utility earnings under an approved plan. In consultation with the Department of Environmental Quality, the Commission shall also report on any impacts to drinking water quality of utility customers or to surface or groundwater resources from Plans implemented by water and sewer utilities. The report may include any other information the Commission deems relevant, and shall include any Commission recommendations for legislative action.

History.

2021-23, s. 25; 2021-149, s. 1(a).

§ 62-133.2.
Fuel and fuel-related charge adjustments for electric utilities.

The Commission shall permit an electric public utility that generates electric power by fossil fuel or nuclear fuel to charge an increment or decrement as a rider to its rates for changes in the cost of fuel and fuel-related costs used in providing its North Carolina customers with electricity from the cost of fuel and fuel-related costs established in the electric public utility’s previous general rate case on the basis of cost per kilowatt hour.

(a1)

As used in this section, “cost of fuel and fuel-related costs” means all of the following:

The cost of fuel burned.

The cost of fuel transportation.

The cost of ammonia, lime, limestone, urea, dibasic acid, sorbents, and catalysts consumed in reducing or treating emissions.

The total delivered noncapacity related costs, including all related transmission charges, of all purchases of electric power by the electric public utility, that are subject to economic dispatch or economic curtailment.

The capacity costs associated with all purchases of electric power from qualifying cogeneration facilities and qualifying small power production facilities, as defined in 16 U.S.C. § 796, that are subject to economic dispatch by the electric public utility.

Except for those costs recovered pursuant to

G.S. 62-133.8

(h), the total delivered costs of all purchases of power from renewable energy facilities and new renewable energy facilities pursuant to

G.S. 62-133.8

or to comply with any federal mandate that is similar to the requirements of subsections (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of G.S. 62-133.8.

The fuel cost component of other purchased power.

Cost of fuel and fuel-related costs shall be adjusted for any net gains or losses resulting from any sales by the electric public utility of fuel and other fuel-related costs components.

Cost of fuel and fuel-related costs shall be adjusted for any net gains or losses resulting from any sales by the electric public utility of by-products produced in the generation process to the extent the costs of the inputs leading to that by-product are costs of fuel or fuel-related costs.

The total delivered costs, including capacity and noncapacity costs, associated with all purchases of electric power from qualifying cogeneration facilities and qualifying small power production facilities, as defined in 16 U.S.C. § 796, that are not subject to economic dispatch or economic curtailment by the electric public utility and not otherwise recovered under subdivision (6) of this subsection.

All nonadministrative costs related to the renewable energy procurement pursuant to

G.S. 62-159.2

not recovered from the program participants.

(a2)

For those costs identified in subdivisions (4), (5), (6), (10), and (11) of subsection (a1) of this section, the annual increase in the aggregate amount of these costs that are recoverable by an electric public utility pursuant to this section shall not exceed two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the electric public utility’s total North Carolina retail jurisdictional gross revenues for the preceding calendar year. The costs described in subdivisions (4), (5), (6), (10), and (11) of subsection (a1) of this section shall be recoverable from each class of customers as a separate component of the rider as follows:

(1)

For the noncapacity costs described in subdivisions (4), (10), and (11) of subsection (a1) of this section, the specific component for each class of customers shall be determined by allocating these costs among customer classes based on the method used in the electric public utility’s most recently filed fuel proceeding commenced on or before January 1, 2017, as determined by the Commission, until the Commission determines how these costs shall be allocated in a general rate case for the electric public utility commenced on or after January 1, 2017.

(2)

For the capacity costs described in subdivisions (5), (6), (10), and (11) of subsection (a1) of this section, the specific component for each class of customers shall be determined by allocating these costs among customer classes based on the method used in the electric public utility’s most recently filed fuel proceeding commenced on or before January 1, 2017, as determined by the Commission, until the Commission determines how these costs shall be allocated in a general rate case for the electric public utility commenced on or after January 1, 2017.

(a3)

Notwithstanding subsections (a1) and (a2) of this section, for an electric public utility that has fewer than 150,000 North Carolina retail jurisdictional customers as of December 31, 2006, the costs identified in subdivisions (1), (2), (6), (7), and (10) of subsection (a1) of this section and the fuel cost component, as may be modified by the Commission, of electric power purchases identified in subdivision (4) of subsection (a1) of this section shall be recovered through the increment or decrement rider approved by the Commission pursuant to this section. For the costs identified in subdivisions (6) and (10) of subsection (a1) of this section that are incurred on or after January 1, 2008, the annual increase in the amount of these costs shall not exceed one percent (1%) of the electric public utility’s total North Carolina retail jurisdictional gross revenues for the preceding calendar year. These costs described in subdivisions (6) and (10) of subsection (a1) of this section shall be recoverable from each class of customers as a separate component of the rider. For the costs described in subdivisions (6) and (10) of subsection (a1) of this section, the specific component for each class of customers shall be determined by allocating these costs among customer classes based on the electric public utility’s North Carolina peak demand for the prior year, as determined by the Commission, until the Commission determines how these costs shall be allocated in a general rate case for the electric public utility commenced on or after January 1, 2008.

The Commission shall conduct a hearing within 12 months of each electric public utility’s last general rate case order to determine whether an increment or decrement rider is required to reflect actual changes in the cost of fuel and fuel-related costs over or under the cost of fuel and fuel-related costs on a kilowatt-hour basis in base rates established in the electric public utility’s last preceding general rate case. Additional hearings shall be held on an annual basis but only one hearing for each electric public utility may be held within 12 months of the last general rate case.

Each electric public utility shall submit to the Commission for the hearing verified annualized information and data in such form and detail as the Commission may require, for an historic 12-month test period, relating to:

Cost of fuel and fuel-related costs used in each generating facility owned in whole or in part by the utility.

Fuel procurement practices and fuel inventories for each facility.

Burned cost of fuel used in each generating facility.

Plant capacity factor for each generating facility.

Plant availability factor for each generating plant.

Generation mix by types of fuel used.

Sources and fuel cost component of purchased power used.

Recipients of and revenues received for power sales and times of power sales.

Test period kilowatt-hour sales for the utility’s total system and on the total system separated for North Carolina jurisdictional sales.

Procurement practices and inventories for: fuel burned and for ammonia, lime, limestone, urea, dibasic acid, sorbents, and catalysts consumed in reducing or treating emissions.

The cost incurred at each generating facility of fuel burned and of ammonia, lime, limestone, urea, dibasic acid, sorbents, and catalysts consumed in reducing or treating emissions.

Any net gains or losses resulting from any sales by the electric public utility of fuel or other fuel-related costs components.

Any net gains or losses resulting from any sales by the electric public utility of by-products produced in the generation process to the extent the costs of the inputs leading to that by-product are costs of fuel or fuel-related costs.

The Commission shall provide for notice of a public hearing with reasonable and adequate time for investigation and for all intervenors to prepare for hearing. At the hearing the Commission shall receive evidence from the utility, the Public Staff, and any intervenor desiring to submit evidence, and from the public generally. In reaching its decision, the Commission shall consider all evidence required under subsection (c) of this section as well as any and all other competent evidence that may assist the Commission in reaching its decision including changes in the cost of fuel consumed and fuel-related costs that occur within a reasonable time, as determined by the Commission, after the test period is closed. The Commission shall incorporate in its cost of fuel and fuel-related costs determination under this subsection the experienced over-recovery or under-recovery of reasonable costs of fuel and fuel-related costs prudently incurred during the test period, based upon the prudent standards set pursuant to subsection (d1) of this section, in fixing an increment or decrement rider. Upon request of the electric public utility, the Commission shall also incorporate in this determination the experienced over-recovery or under-recovery of costs of fuel and fuel-related costs through the date that is 30 calendar days prior to the date of the hearing, provided that the reasonableness and prudence of these costs shall be subject to review in the utility’s next annual hearing pursuant to this section. The Commission shall use deferral accounting, and consecutive test periods, in complying with this subsection, and the over-recovery or under-recovery portion of the increment or decrement shall be reflected in rates for 12 months, notwithstanding any changes in the base fuel cost in a general rate case. The burden of proof as to the correctness and reasonableness of the charge and as to whether the cost of fuel and fuel-related costs were reasonably and prudently incurred shall be on the utility. The Commission shall allow only that portion, if any, of a requested cost of fuel and fuel-related costs adjustment that is based on adjusted and reasonable cost of fuel and fuel-related costs prudently incurred under efficient management and economic operations. In evaluating whether cost of fuel and fuel-related costs were reasonable and prudently incurred, the Commission shall apply the rule adopted pursuant to subsection (d1) of this section. To the extent that the Commission determines that an increment or decrement to the rates of the utility due to changes in the cost of fuel and fuel-related costs over or under base fuel costs established in the preceding general rate case is just and reasonable, the Commission shall order that the increment or decrement become effective for all sales of electricity and remain in effect until changed in a subsequent general rate case or annual proceeding under this section.

(d1)

Within one year after ratification of this act, for the purposes of setting cost of fuel and fuel-related costs rates, the Commission shall adopt a rule that establishes prudent standards and procedures with which it can appropriately measure management efficiency in minimizing cost of fuel and fuel-related costs.

If the Commission has not issued an order pursuant to this section within 180 days of a utility’s submission of annual data under subsection (c) of this section, the utility may place the requested cost of fuel and fuel-related costs adjustment into effect. If the change in rate is finally determined to be excessive, the utility shall make refund of any excess plus interest to its customers in a manner ordered by the Commission.

Nothing in this section shall relieve the Commission from its duty to consider the reasonableness of the cost of fuel and fuel-related costs in a general rate case and to set rates reflecting reasonable cost of fuel and fuel-related costs pursuant to

G.S. 62-133

. Nothing in this section shall invalidate or preempt any condition adopted by the Commission and accepted by the utility in any proceeding that would limit the recovery of costs by any electric public utility under this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-120, s. 10(d), effective September 18, 2014.

History.

1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1197, s. 1; 1987, c. 677, ss. 1, 5; 1989, c. 15, s. 1; 1991, c. 129, s. 1; 1995, c. 15, ss. 1, 2; 2007-397, s. 5; 2011-291, s. 2.11; 2014-120, s. 10(d); 2017-192, s. 4(a); 2018-114, s. 22.

§ 62-133.3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 27, s. 5.